Arkansas, session 2025, HB1274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-35-601(b), concerning the collection of
personal property taxes with real estate taxes, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) Any Except as provided in subdivisions (c)(2)-(4) of this section,
a county collector knowingly accepting payment of general real estate taxes
without requiring the payment of personal property taxes due as reflected by
the records in the county collector's office shall be deemed guilty of a
violation and upon conviction shall be fined in a sum not less than twenty-
five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-35-601(c)(3), concerning the collection
of personal property taxes with real estate taxes, is amended to read as
*JLL088*
03-10-2025 11:14:09 JLL088

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1274
follows:
(3)(A) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, a
county collector shall accept payment of general real estate taxes on a
parcel of property at the time the ownership of the property is being
transferred if the taxpayer transferring title to the property has paid all
delinquent personal property taxes.
(B)(i) A county collector who receives a written or
electronically delivered request from a person or entity facilitating the
closing of a real estate transaction for a statement of all real estate taxes
owed for the parcel or parcels being conveyed and any related delinquent
personal property taxes owed by the owner of the parcel or parcels being
conveyed shall respond in writing or by electronic mail within three (3)
business days of receiving the request.
(ii) If a county collector fails to comply with
subdivision (c)(3)(B)(i) of this section, he or she shall accept the payment
of the real estate taxes due on the parcel or parcels that were the subject
of the request under subdivision (c)(3)(B)(i) of this section without
requiring the payment of any related personal property taxes.

/s/Warren
















03-10-2025 11:14:09 JLL088